New Mexico, session 2026, SB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 30-16-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1963, Chapter 303, Section 16-3, as amended) is amended to read: "30-16-3. BURGLARY.-- A. Burglary consists of the unauthorized entry of [any] a vehicle, a watercraft, an aircraft, a dwelling or other structure, movable or immovable, with the intent to commit any felony or theft [therein] in the vehicle, watercraft, aircraft, dwelling or other structure. [A.] B. Any person who, without authorization, enters a dwelling [house] with intent to commit any felony or theft therein is guilty of a third degree felony. [B.] C. Any person who, without authorization, enters any vehicle, watercraft, aircraft or other structure, movable or immovable, with intent to commit any felony or theft therein is guilty of a fourth degree felony. D. As used in this section, "structure" includes a protected space enclosed to the degree that it is capable of confining people or property and creates the expectation of privacy against an unauthorized intrusion. The boundaries of a structure may extend to a partially enclosed construction attached to and constituting an extension of a dwelling, in a location that creates the expectation of privacy and in such a manner that a reasonable person would expect protection from an unauthorized intrusion." SECTION 2. Section 30-16-4 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1963, Chapter 303, Section 16-4) is amended to read: "30-16-4. AGGRAVATED BURGLARY.-- A. Aggravated burglary consists of the unauthorized entry of [any] a vehicle, a watercraft, an aircraft, a dwelling or other structure, movable or immovable, with intent to commit [any] a felony or theft [therein] in the vehicle, watercraft, aircraft, dwelling or other structure and the person either: [A.] (1) is armed with a deadly weapon; [B.] (2) after entering, [arms himself] is armed with a deadly weapon; or [C.] (3) commits a battery upon [any] a person while in [such] the place or in entering or leaving [such] the place. B. Whoever commits aggravated burglary is guilty of a second degree felony. C. As used in this section, "structure" includes a protected space enclosed to the degree that it is capable of confining people or property and creates the expectation of privacy against an unauthorized intrusion. The boundaries of a structure may extend to a partially enclosed construction attached to and constituting an extension of a dwelling, in a location that creates the expectation of privacy and in such a manner that a reasonable person would expect protection from an unauthorized intrusion." - 3 -